California statutes. Vehicle Code
(c) An application for renewal of identification, whether or not accompanied by an application for transfer of title to, or any interest in, the vehicle, shall be submitted to the department with payment of the required fees for the current identification period and without penalty for delinquent payment of fees imposed under this code if the department receives the application on or before the date the vehicle is first operated, used, or transported on public property or private property in a manner so as to subject the vehicle to identification and certification of nonoperation required pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) A certification of nonoperation is not required to be filed pursuant to subdivision (a) for a vehicle on which the identification expires while being held as inventory by a dealer or lessor-retailer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 719, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

38125.

Whenever by reason of the theft or embezzlement of an off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification the owner or legal owner is not in possession of the vehicle at the time penalties accrue for failure to obtain identification, or renewal thereof, the owner or legal owner may secure the identification or renewal of the identification of the vehicle within 20 days after its recovery upon filing an affidavit setting forth the circumstances of the theft or embezzlement if the theft or embezzlement of the vehicle has been reported pursuant to provisions of this code, without penalty for delinquent payment of fees imposed under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 947.)
-------------------------------------------

38130.

When application for identification of an off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification has been made as required by this division, the vehicle may be operated pursuant to this division until the new indicia of current identification have been received from the department on condition that there be displayed on the vehicle the identification plate or device and validating device, if any, issued to the vehicle for the previous identification term.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1816.)
-------------------------------------------

38135.

The department may, upon renewing of an identification of off-highway motor vehicles subject to identification, issue a new identification certificate or may endorse or authorize the endorsement of a receipt or validation upon payment of the required fees. The receipt or validation to be stamped upon the identification certificate last issued for the vehicle during the preceding period, or upon a potential identification certificate issued near the close of the preceding period, which identification certificate so endorsed or validated shall constitute the identification certificate for the ensuing two-year period. If the identification certificate and
 potential identification certificate are unavailable, a fee as specified in Section 38260 shall not be paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1268, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Refusal of Identification [38145. - 38150.]

38145.

The department shall refuse the identification or renewal or transfer of identification of an off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification upon any of the following grounds:

(a) That the application contains any false or fraudulent statement.

(b) That the required fee has not been paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1816.)
-------------------------------------------

38150.

The department may refuse the identification or renewal or transfer of identification of an off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification in any of the following circumstances:

(a) If the department is satisfied that the applicant is not entitled thereto under this code.

(b) If the applicant has failed to furnish the department with information required in the application or reasonable additional information required by the department.

(c) If the department determines that
 the applicant has made or permitted unlawful use of any identification certificate, certificate of ownership, identification plates, or other identifying indicia.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Identification Plate or Device [38160. - 38170.]

38160.

The department, upon identifying an off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification, shall issue to the owner a suitable identification plate or device which is capable of being attached to the vehicle in such a manner so as to not endanger the operator or passengers of the vehicle, and which shall identify the vehicle for which it is issued for the period of its validity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1816.)
-------------------------------------------

38165.

(a) The department shall determine the size, color, and letters or number of the plate or device issued pursuant to this division and the life of the series of plate or device issued, but in no event less than six years. The design of the plate or device shall have the identification number as the most prominent feature of the device. During the intervening identification periods for which the plate or device is issued, the department shall issue a tab, sticker, or other suitable device to indicate the term for which such plate or device
 will be valid.

(b) On or before July 1, 2009, the department, in conjunction with the Division of Off-Highway Motor Vehicle Recreation of the Department of Parks and Recreation, shall report to the Assembly Committee on Water, Parks and Wildlife and the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Water, regarding recommendations to improve the identification of off-highway motor vehicles. At a minimum, the report shall examine the benefits and challenges of all of the following:

(1) Using multiple identification stickers for each vehicle.

(2) Using large-print identifying numbers or letters.

(3) Various identifying devices, such as license plates and stickers.

(4) Requiring license plates or
 other device alternatives for certain off-highway vehicle types.

(5) Including a unique number for special nonresident permits issued under Section 38087.5.

(c) In preparing the report, the department and the Division of Off-Highway Motor Vehicle Recreation shall work with vehicle manufacturers to evaluate feasibility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 541, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

38170.

(a) Every off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification shall have displayed upon it the identification number assigned to the vehicle for which it is issued, together with the word “California” or the abbreviation “CAL” and the year number for which it is issued or a suitable device issued by the department for validation purposes, which device shall contain the year for which it is issued.

(b) The identification plate or device shall at all times be securely fastened
 to the vehicle for which it is issued and shall be mounted or affixed in a position to be clearly visible, and shall be maintained in a condition so as to be clearly legible. No covering shall be used on the identification plate or device.

(c) All identification plates or devices issued on or after January 1, 1996, shall be displayed as follows:

(1) On the left fork leg of a motorcycle, either horizontal or vertical, and shall be visible from the left side of the motorcycle.

(2) On the left quadrant of the metal frame member of sand rails, rail-type buggies, and dune buggies, visible from the rear of the vehicle.

(3) On the left rear quadrant on permanent plastic or metal frame members of all-terrain vehicles, visible to outside inspections.

(4) On the left tunnel on the back quadrant of snowmobiles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 14, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Dismantling of Off-Highway Motor Vehicles [38180. - 38185.]

38180.

Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 11500) of Division 5 shall be applicable to off-highway motor vehicles subject to identification, except as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1816.)
-------------------------------------------

38185.

No off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification which has been reported dismantled or sold as salvage may be subsequently identified until it has been inspected by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1816.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Transfers of Title or Interest [38195. - 38211.]

38195.

The provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 5600) of Division 3 shall be applicable to off-highway motor vehicles subject to identification, and the terms “registration,” “registration card,” and “registered” as used therein, shall apply to the terms “identification,” “identification certificate,” and “identified,” respectively, except that Sections 5901, 5902, 5903, 5904, 5906, and 6052 shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1816.)
-------------------------------------------

38200.

(a) Every licensed dealer upon transferring by sale, lease, or otherwise any off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification, whether new or used, of a type subject to identification under this division, shall, not later than the end of the fifth calendar day thereafter, not counting the day of sale, lease, or other transfer, give written notice of the transfer to the department upon an appropriate form provided by it; but a dealer need not give the notice when selling or transferring a new unidentified off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification to another dealer.

A “sale” shall be deemed
 completed and consummated when the purchaser of that vehicle has paid the purchase price, or, in lieu thereof, has signed a purchase contract or security agreement, and taken physical possession or delivery of that vehicle.

(b) Every dealer of off-highway motor vehicles subject to identification who is not licensed with the department, and who engages only in the sale of vehicles of a type not properly equipped for operation upon the highway and that are restricted to off-highway operation or use, shall comply with the provisions of Section 5900, or such regulations as the director determines are necessary to carry out the provisions of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 440.)
-------------------------------------------

38205.

Whenever any person has received as transferee a properly endorsed certificate of ownership, he or she shall, within 10 days thereafter, endorse the ownership certificate as required and forward the ownership certificate with the proper transfer fee and, if required under Section 38120, any other fee due and thereby make application for transfer of identification. The certificate of ownership shall contain a space for the applicant’s driver’s license or identification card number, and the applicant shall furnish that number, if any, in the space
 provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1221, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

38210.

When the transferee of an off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification is a dealer who holds such vehicle for resale, the dealer is not required to make application for transfer, but upon transferring his title or interest to another person he shall comply with this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1816.)
-------------------------------------------

38211.

(a) The department shall withhold identification of or the transfer of ownership of any vehicle subject to identification under this division until the applicant pays to the department the use tax measured by the sales price of the vehicle as required by the Sales and Use Tax Law, together with penalty, if any, unless the purchaser presents evidence on a form prescribed by the State Board of Equalization that sales tax will be paid by the seller or that use tax has been collected by the seller or that the State Board of Equalization finds that no use tax is due. If the applicant so desires, he may pay the use tax and penalty, if any, to the department
 so as to secure immediate action upon his application for identification or transfer of ownership, and thereafter he may apply through the Department of Motor Vehicles to the State Board of Equalization under the provisions of the Sales and Use Tax Law for a refund of the amount so paid. 

(b) The department shall transmit to the State Board of Equalization all collections of use tax and penalty made under this section. This transmittal shall be made at least monthly, accompanied by a schedule in such form as the department and board may prescribe.

(c) The State Board of Equalization shall reimburse the department for its costs incurred in carrying out the provisions of this section. Such reimbursement shall be effected under agreement between the agencies, approved by the Department of Finance.

(d) In computing any
 use tax or penalty thereon under the provisions of this section dollar fractions shall be disregarded in the manner specified in Section 9559 of this code. Payment of tax and penalty on this basis shall be deemed full compliance with the requirements of the Sales and Use Tax Law insofar as they are applicable to the use of vehicles to which this section relates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1816.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Identification Fees [38225. - 38265.]

38225.

(a) A service fee of seven dollars ($7) shall be paid to the department for the issuance or renewal of identification of off-highway motor vehicles subject to identification, except as expressly exempted under this division.

(b) In addition to the service fee required by subdivision (a), a special fee of thirty-three dollars ($33) shall be paid at the time of payment of the service fee for the issuance or renewal of an identification plate or device.

(c) All money transferred pursuant to Section 8352.6 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, all fees received by the department pursuant to
 subdivision (b), and all day use, overnight use, or annual or biennial use fees for state vehicular recreation areas received by the Department of Parks and Recreation shall be deposited in the Off-Highway Vehicle Trust Fund, which is hereby created. There shall be a separate reporting of special fee revenues by vehicle type, including four-wheeled vehicles, all-terrain vehicles, motorcycles, and snowmobiles. All money shall be deposited in the fund, and, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be allocated according to Section 5090.61 of the Public Resources Code.

(d) Any money temporarily transferred by the Legislature from the Off-Highway Vehicle Trust Fund to the General Fund shall be reimbursed, without interest, by the Legislature within two fiscal years of the transfer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 456, Sec. 1.   (SB 159)   Effective October 3, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

38225.4.

In addition to the service fees specified in subdivision (a) of Section 38225, as amended by Section 6 of Chapter 964 of the Statutes of 1992, a fee of three dollars ($3) shall be paid at the time of issuance or renewal of identification of off-highway motor vehicles subject to identification, except as expressly exempted under this division. The department shall deposit the fee received under this section in the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund. The money deposited in the account pursuant to this section shall be available, upon
 appropriation by the Legislature, for expenditure to offset the costs of maintaining the uniformed field strength of the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1197) by Stats. 2003, Ch. 719, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

38225.5.

In addition to the service fees specified in Section 38225, a fee of three dollars ($3) shall be paid at the time of issuance or renewal of identification of off-highway vehicles subject to identification, except as expressly exempted under this division. The department shall deposit the fee received under this section in the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund. The money deposited in the account pursuant to this section shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for expenditure to offset the costs of increasing the uniformed
 field strength of the Department of the California Highway Patrol beyond its 1994 staffing level and those costs associated with maintaining this new level of uniformed field strength and carrying out those duties specified in subdivision (a) of Section 830.2 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 719, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

38230.

In addition to the fees imposed by Section 38225, there shall be paid a four-dollar ($4) fee for the issuance or renewal of identification for every off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification. The fee imposed by this section is in lieu of all taxes according to value levied for state or local purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1816.)
-------------------------------------------

38231.

The fees for a special permit issued under Section 38087 shall be the prevailing identification fees as set forth in Sections 38225 and 38230 and shall be deposited and distributed as are identification fees under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 973.)
-------------------------------------------

38231.5.

(a) The fee for a special permit issued under Section 38087.5 shall be not less than twenty dollars ($20), as established by the Department of Parks and Recreation. The Department of Parks and Recreation may adjust the special permit fee for a permit issued to a nonresident of this state under Section 38087.5, as necessary, to recover the costs of this program. After deducting its administrative and vendor costs, the Department of Parks and Recreation shall deposit the fees received under this section in the Off-Highway Vehicle Trust Fund.
 Money in the fund shall be allocated, upon appropriation, as provided in Sections 5090.50 and 5090.64 of the Public Resources Code.

(b) The Department of Parks and Recreation shall print the special permits required by Section 38087.5 and shall supervise the sale of those permits throughout the state.

(c) The Department of Parks and Recreation shall either distribute and sell the special permits directly or contract with vendors according to rules and regulations established by that department. The vendors shall receive a commission in an amount not to exceed 5 percent of the fee imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) for each special permit sold. The Department of Parks and Recreation may solicit the participation of qualified retail commercial enterprises engaged in the sale or rental of off-highway vehicles, equipment, accessories, or supplies to act as authorized vendors of the
 special permits and may authorize local and federal agencies that provide off-highway vehicle opportunities to act as authorized vendors of the special permits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 563, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

38231.7.

The Department of Parks and Recreation shall set, and may adjust, the amount of the fee to recover the operating and administrative costs of a sanctioned event permit issued pursuant to Section 38087.7. The Department of Parks and Recreation shall deposit fees received pursuant to this section in the Off-Highway Vehicle Trust Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 446, Sec. 2.   (SB 708)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

38232.

A special fee of fifteen dollars ($15) shall be paid to the department for the issuance of a special transportation identification device issued pursuant to Section 38088 and shall be deposited in the Motor Vehicle Account in the Transportation Tax Fund. The fee is in lieu of the fees provided in Section 38225.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 719, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

38235.

All money collected by the department under Section 38230 shall be reported monthly to the Controller and at the same time be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Off-Highway License Fee Fund, which is hereby created.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 970, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

38240.

(a) The Controller shall allocate the fees collected under Section 38230 in July and January of each fiscal year to cities and counties based upon the proportional estimated off-highway motor vehicle use and related activity within the respective jurisdictions pursuant to the report described in subdivision (d) of Section 5090.15 of the Public Resources Code.

(b) The funds collected under Section 38230 shall be used for the purposes set forth in Sections
 5090.50 and 5090.64 of the Public Resources Code.

(c) In addition to the purposes set forth in subdivision (b), funds received by a city or county pursuant to this section may be expended for facilities located outside the limits of the city or county if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The funds are expended for the purposes of acquiring, developing, and constructing trails, areas, or other facilities for the use of off-highway motor vehicles.

(2) The funds are expended pursuant to an agreement with the city in which the facility is located or with the county in which the facility is located if the facility is located in an unincorporated territory.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2006.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 21) and added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 908, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative January 1, 2006, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

38245.

Whenever an off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification is operated or transported in this state without the fees required by this division having first been paid, the fee is delinquent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 974.)
-------------------------------------------

38246.

(a) A penalty shall be added upon any application for renewal of identification made on or after the day following the expiration date, except as provided in Section 4605, 38121, or 38247.

(b) If the fee specified in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 38255 is not paid within 10 days after the fee becomes delinquent, a penalty shall be assessed. 

(c) If renewal fee penalties have not accrued and the ownership of the
 vehicle is transferred, the transferee has 20 days from the date of transfer to pay the identification fees that become due without payment of any penalties that would otherwise be required under subdivision (a) or to file a certificate of nonoperation pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 38121, if the vehicle will not be operated, used, or transported on public property or private property in a manner so as to subject the vehicle to identification during the subsequent identification period without first making application for identification of the vehicle, including full payment of all fees.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in this section, if any fee is not paid within 20 days after the fee becomes delinquent, a penalty shall be assessed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1008, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

38247.

(a) When a transferee or purchaser of a vehicle applies for transfer of identification, as provided in Section 38205, and it is determined by the department that penalties accrued prior to the purchase of the vehicle, and that the transferee or purchaser was not cognizant of the nonpayment of the fees for identification for the current or prior identification years, the department may waive the identification penalties upon payment of the fees for identification due.

(b) Other provisions of this code notwithstanding, the director may at his discretion investigate into the circumstances of any
 application for identification to ascertain if penalties had accrued through no fault or intent of the owner. Provided such circumstances prevail, the director may waive any penalties upon payment of the fees for identification then due.

(c) When a transferee or purchaser of a vehicle applies for transfer of identification of a vehicle, and it is determined by the department that fees for identification of the vehicle for any year are unpaid and due, that such fees became due prior to the purchase of the vehicle by the transferee or purchaser and that the transferee or purchaser was not cognizant of the fact that such fees were unpaid and due, the department may waive such fees and any penalty thereon when the identification fees due for the vehicle for the current year are paid.

(d) Upon the transfer of a vehicle for which fees for identification and any penalties thereon are
 unpaid and due, such fees and penalties are, notwithstanding the provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 9800) of this chapter, the personal debt of the transferor of the vehicle who did not pay such fees and penalties when they became due or accrued. Such fees and penalties may be collected by the department in an appropriate civil action if the department has waived such fees and penalties pursuant to subdivision (c).

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 935.)
-------------------------------------------

38250.

Whenever any person has received as transferee a properly endorsed certificate of ownership and the transfer fee has not been paid as required by this division within 10 days, the fee is delinquent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1268, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

38255.

Upon application for transfer of ownership or any interest of an owner, or legal owner in or to any off-highway motor vehicle identified under this division, there shall be paid the following fees: (a) For a transfer by the owner $15(b) For a transfer by the legal owner $15(c) When application is presented showing a transfer by both the owner and legal owner $15

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 719, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

38260.

Upon application for a duplicate ownership certificate or identification certificate, or a duplicate or substitute identification plate or device, or any other tabs, stickers, or devices, there shall be paid a fee in the amount of fifteen dollars ($15).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 719, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

38265.

(a) The penalty for delinquency in respect to any transfer shall be fifteen dollars ($15), and shall apply only to the last transfer.

(b) The penalty for delinquency in respect to the fees imposed by Sections 38225 and 38230 shall be equal to one-half the fee after it has been computed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 719, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Off-Highway Vehicle Operating Rules [38280. - 38321.]



  ARTICLE 1. Traffic Signs, Signals, and Markings [38280. - 38302.]

38280.

Federal, state, or local authorities having jurisdiction over public lands may place or cause to be placed and maintained, such appropriate signs, signals and other traffic control devices as may be necessary to properly indicate and carry out any provision of law or any duly adopted regulation of such governmental authority or to warn or guide traffic.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------

38285.

Only those signs, signals, markings, or devices that conform to the uniform standards and specifications adopted by the Department of Parks and Recreation, with the approval of the Off-Highway Motor Vehicle Recreation Commission, shall be placed as provided in Section 38280.

Special signs, signals, markings, or devices may be used on a temporary basis for purposes of directing traffic on and at sanctioned events conducted on public lands with permission of the agency having administrative jurisdiction over such lands.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 729, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

38286.

The provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 38305), Article 4 (commencing with Section 38312), Article 5 (commencing with Section 38316), Section 38319 of this chapter, and subdivision (h) of Section 38370 shall not apply to a motor vehicle being operated in an organized racing event that is conducted under the auspices of a recognized sanctioning body or by permit issued by the governmental authority having jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 563, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

38300.

It is unlawful for the driver of any vehicle to disobey any sign, signal, or traffic control device placed or maintained pursuant to Section 38280.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------

38301.

(a) It is unlawful to operate a vehicle in violation of special regulations which have been promulgated by the governmental agency having jurisdiction over public lands, including, but not limited to, regulations governing access, routes of travel, plants, wildlife, wildlife habitat, water resources, and historical sites.

(b) A person who operates a motor vehicle in an area closed to that vehicle is guilty of a public offense and shall be punished as follows:

(1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3), the offense is an infraction punishable by a fine not exceeding fifty dollars ($50).

(2) For a second offense committed within seven years after a prior violation for which there was a conviction punishable under paragraph (1), the offense is an infraction punishable by a fine not exceeding seventy-five dollars ($75).

(3) For a third or subsequent offense committed within seven years after two or more prior violations for which there were convictions punishable under this section, the offense is punishable by a fine not exceeding one hundred fifty dollars ($150). In addition to the fine, the court may assess costs sufficient to repair property damage resulting from the violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 541, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

38301.3.

Notwithstanding subdivision (d) of Section 5008 of the Public Resources Code, or any other provision of state law, and to the extent authorized under federal law, a person who violates a state or federal regulation that prohibits entry of a motor vehicle into all or portions of an area designated as a federal or state wilderness area is guilty of a public offense and shall be punished as follows:

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), the offense is an infraction punishable by a fine
 not exceeding one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

(b) For a second offense committed within seven years after a prior violation for which there was a conviction punishable under subdivision (a), the offense is an infraction punishable by a fine not exceeding two hundred twenty-five dollars ($225).

(c) (1) For a third or subsequent offense committed within seven years after two or more prior violations for which there were convictions punishable under this section, the offense is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not exceeding three hundred dollars ($300) or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding 90 days, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(2) In addition to the fine imposed under paragraph (1), the court may order impoundment of the vehicle used in the offense under the following
 conditions:

(A) The person convicted under this subdivision is the owner of the vehicle.

(B) The vehicle is subject to Section 4000 or 38010.

(3) The period of impoundment imposed pursuant to this subdivision shall be not less than one day nor more than 30 days. The impoundment shall be at the owner’s expense.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 571, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

38301.5.

Every person convicted of violating a local ordinance which is adopted by a city with a population over 2,000,000 persons pursuant to Section 38301 and which prohibits entry into all or portions of an area designated by ordinance as a mountain fire district shall be punished as follows:

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), the offense is an infraction punishable by a fine not exceeding one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

(b) For a second offense committed within one year of a prior violation for which there was a
 conviction punishable under subdivision (a), the offense is punishable as an infraction by a fine not exceeding two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(c) (1) For a third or subsequent offense committed within one year of two or more prior violations for which there were convictions punishable under this section, the offense is punishable as a misdemeanor by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding 90 days, or by both that fine and imprisonment. Additionally, the court may order impoundment of the vehicle used in the offense under the following conditions: 

(A) The person convicted under this subdivision is the owner of the vehicle. 

(B) The vehicle is subject to Section 38010.

(2) The period of impoundment imposed pursuant to this subdivision shall be not less than one day nor more than 30 days. The impoundment shall be at the owner’s expense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1015, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

38302.

It is unlawful for any person to place or erect any sign, signal, or traffic control device for off-highway traffic upon public lands unless authorized by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Operating Controls [38304. - 38304.1.]

38304.

The operator of an off-highway motor vehicle shall be able to reach and operate all controls necessary to safely operate the vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------

38304.1.

(a) Neither a parent or guardian of a child who is under 14 years of age, nor an adult who is authorized by the parent or guardian to supervise that child, shall grant permission to, or knowingly allow, that child to operate an off-highway motor vehicle in a manner that violates Section 38304.

(b) A person convicted of a violation of subdivision (a) is punishable as follows:

(1) For a first conviction, the court shall impose a fine of thirty-five dollars ($35).

(2) For a second conviction, a fine of not less than thirty-five dollars ($35) nor more than fifty dollars ($50).

(3) For a third or any subsequent conviction, a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than seventy-five dollars ($75).

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 414, Sec. 3.   (AB 134)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Speed Laws [38305. - 38310.]

38305.

No person shall drive an off-highway motor vehicle at a speed greater than is reasonable or prudent and in no event at a speed which endangers the safety of other persons or property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------

38310.

The prima facie speed limit within 50 feet of any campground, campsite, or concentration of people or animals shall be 15 miles per hour unless changed as authorized by this code and, if so changed, only when signs have been erected giving notice thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Turning and Starting [38312. - 38314.]

38312.

No person shall place in motion an off-highway motor vehicle that is stopped, standing, or parked until such movement can be made with reasonable safety.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------

38314.

No person shall turn an off-highway motor vehicle from a direct course or move right or left until such movement can be made with reasonable safety.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Reckless Driving [38316. - 38318.5.]

38316.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to drive any off-highway motor vehicle with a willful and wanton disregard for the safety of other persons or property.

(b) Any person who violates this section shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than five days nor more than 90 days or by fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) or by both such fine and imprisonment, except as provided in Section 38317.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 397.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

38317.

Whenever reckless driving of an off-highway motor vehicle proximately causes bodily injury to any person, the person driving the vehicle shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 30 days nor more than six months or by fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 398.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

38318.

(a) Any person who throws any substance at an off-highway motor vehicle or occupant thereof is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished pursuant to Section 42002 by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(b) Any person who, with intent to do great bodily injury, maliciously and willfully throws or projects any rock, brick, bottle, metal, or other missile, projects any other substance capable of doing serious bodily harm, or discharges a
 firearm at an off-highway motor vehicle or occupant thereof is guilty of a felony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 729, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

38318.5.

(a) Any person who maliciously removes or alters trail, danger, or directional markers or signs provided for the safety or guidance of off-highway motor vehicles is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished pursuant to Section 42002 by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(b) Any person who, with intent to do great bodily injury (1) proximately causes great bodily injury to any person as a result of acts prohibited by subdivision (a), or (2)
 erects or places any cable, chain, rope, fishing line, or other similar material which is unmarked or intentionally placed, or both, for malicious purpose is guilty of a felony.
